Nebraska, session 109, LB972A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $72,400 from the General Fund
for FY2026-27 and (2) $69,400 from the General Fund for FY2027-28 to the
Department of Revenue, for Program 102, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 972, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $50,700 for FY2026-27 or
$52,200 for FY2027-28.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $521,520 from the License Plate
Cash Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $530,540 from the License Plate Cash Fund for
FY2027-28 to the Department of Motor Vehicles, for Program 90, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 972, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated (1) $900,000 from the Developmental
Disabilities Provider Capital and Equipment Maintenance Cash Fund for FY2026-27
and (2) $1,800,000 from the Developmental Disabilities Provider Capital and
Equipment Maintenance Cash Fund for FY2027-28 to the Department of Health and
Human Services, for Program 424, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 972, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$900,000 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2027-28 $1,800,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 4. There is hereby appropriated (1) $13,500 from the Military
Department Aid Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $30,000 from the Military Department
Aid Fund for FY2027-28 to the Military Department, for Program 544, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 972, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27
$13,500 Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2027-28 $30,000
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 5. There is hereby appropriated (1) $500 from the Back the Blue Cash
Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $1,000 from the Back the Blue Cash Fund for
FY2027-28 to the Nebraska State Patrol, for Program 100, to aid in carrying out
the provisions of Legislative Bill 972, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second
Session, 2026.
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2026-27 $500
Cash Funds for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose. There is
included in the appropriation to this program for FY2027-28 $1,000 Cash Funds
for state aid, which shall only be used for such purpose.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
-1-